Idaho, session 2026, H0949.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Workforce Development Council the fol-
lowing amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes
from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $696,800 $1,094,100 $1,293,300 $3,084,200
In-Demand Careers
Fund 0 0 1,150,000 1,150,000
TOTAL $696,800 $1,094,100 $2,443,300 $4,234,200
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
there is hereby reduced from the Workforce Development Council the following
amounts from the designated expense classes from the In-Demand Careers Fund
for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $400,000
Operating Expenditures 750,000
TOTAL $1,150,000
SECTION 3. In addition to any other authorization provided by law, the
full-time equivalent position authorization provided to the Workforce De-


velopment Council is hereby increased by six (6.00) for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
there is hereby reduced from the STEM Action Center the following amounts
from the designated expense classes from the listed funds for the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $774,400 $1,195,700 $90,500 $1,000,000 $3,060,600
STEM Education
Fund 0 100,000 0 2,829,900 2,929,900
TOTAL $774,400 $1,295,700 $90,500 $3,829,900 $5,990,500
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the full-time equivalent position authorization provided to the STEM Action
Center is hereby reduced by seven (7.00) for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the STEM Action Center in Section 1, Chapter 239,
Laws of 2025, is hereby reduced by the following amounts from the designated
expense classes from the General Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR:
Operating Expenditures $33,100
Trustee and Benefit Payments 43,300
TOTAL $76,400
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 6 of this act shall be in full force and effect
upon passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 5 of this act shall be in
full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.